Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1136YH (9) 91 th/ns H.F. 506 Section 1. Section 321.218, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. A person whose driverâs license or operating privilege 3 has been denied, canceled, suspended, or revoked as provided 4 in this chapter or as provided in section 252J.8 , and who 5 operates a motor vehicle upon the highways of this state while 6 the license or privilege is denied, canceled, suspended, or 7 revoked, commits a simple misdemeanor one of the following: 8 a. For a first offense, a simple misdemeanor punishable 9 as a scheduled violation under section 805.8A, subsection 10 4, paragraph â0kâ . In addition to any other penalties, the 11 punishment imposed for a violation of this subsection shall 12 include assessment of a fine of not less than two hundred fifty 13 dollars nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars. 14 b. For a second offense, a simple misdemeanor. 15 c. For a third or subsequent offense, a serious misdemeanor. 16 Sec. 2. Section 321.218, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 17 by striking the subsection. 18 Sec. 3. Section 321A.32, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 1. a. Any A person whose license or registration or 21 nonresidentâs nonresident operating privilege has been 22 suspended, denied, or revoked under this chapter or continues 23 to remain suspended or revoked under this chapter , and who, 24 during such suspension, denial, or revocation, or during such 25 continuing suspension or continuing revocation, drives any 26 motor vehicle upon any highway or knowingly commits one of the 27 following: 28 (1) For a first offense, a simple misdemeanor punishable 29 as a scheduled violation under section 805.8A, subsection 4, 30 paragraph â0kâ . 31 (2) For a second offense, a simple misdemeanor. 32 (3) For a third or subsequent offense, a serious 33 misdemeanor. 34 b. A person who drives or knowingly permits any a motor 35 -1- LSB 1136YH (9) 91 th/ns 1/ 4 H.F. 506 vehicle owned by such person to be operated by another upon 1 any a highway, while the vehicleâs registration is suspended, 2 denied, or revoked under this chapter, except as permitted 3 under this chapter , shall be guilty of a simple misdemeanor. 4 In addition to any other penalties, the punishment imposed 5 for a violation of this subsection paragraph shall include 6 assessment of a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars 7 nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars. 8 Sec. 4. Section 321J.21, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 1. A person whose driverâs license or nonresident operating 11 privilege has been suspended, denied, revoked, or barred due 12 to a violation of this chapter and who drives a motor vehicle 13 while the license or privilege is suspended, denied, revoked, 14 or barred commits a serious misdemeanor one of the following: 15 a. For a first offense, a simple misdemeanor punishable 16 as a scheduled violation under section 805.8A, subsection 17 4, paragraph â0kâ . In addition to any other penalties, the 18 punishment imposed for a violation of this subsection shall 19 include assessment of a fine of one thousand dollars. 20 b. For a second offense, a simple misdemeanor. 21 c. For a third or subsequent offense, a serious misdemeanor. 22 Sec. 5. Section 805.8A, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 23 by adding the following new paragraph: 24 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0k. Section 321.218, subsection 1, paragraph 25 âaâ , section 321A.32, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph 26 (1), and section 321J.21, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . . . . . $250. 27